Nebraska, session 109, LB414.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. (1) The suicide mortality review team is established in the
Department of Veterans' Affairs.
(2) For purposes of sections 1 to 6 of this act:
(a) Department means the Department of Veterans' Affairs;
(b) Director means the Director of the Department of Veterans' Affairs or
the director's designee; and
(c) Review team means the suicide mortality review team established in
subsection (1) of this section.
Sec. 2. (1) The suicide mortality review team shall consist of the
following members: (a) The director; (b) a representative of the Nebraska
Violent Death Reporting System; (c) a representative of Nebraska Local Outreach
to Suicide Loss Survivors; and (d) a representative of the Division of
Behavioral Health of the Department of Health and Human Services.
(2) The director shall appoint the following individuals to be additional
members of the suicide mortality review team: (a) An education administrator;
(b) a hospital representative; (c) an emergency medical services
representative; (d) a member of law enforcement; (e) a mental health
professional or a licensed clinical social worker; (f) a veteran
representative; and (g) additional members as needed.
(3) The department shall provide professional and administrative support
to the review team.
Sec. 3. The suicide mortality review team shall:
(1) Develop a suicide mortalities data collection system;
(2) Conduct an annual analysis of the incidences and causes of suicides in
this state during the preceding fiscal year;
(3) Develop protocols for suicide investigations, including protocols for
law enforcement agencies, prosecutors, medical examiners, health care
facilities, and social service agencies;
(4) Study the adequacy of statutes, ordinances, rules, training, and
services to determine the changes required to decrease the incidence of
preventable suicides and, as appropriate, take steps to implement these
changes;
(5) Educate the public regarding the incidences and causes of suicide and
the public's role in preventing these deaths; and
(6) Designate a member of the suicide mortality review team to serve as
chairperson.
Sec. 4. The review team shall establish a cooperative agreement with the
Nebraska Violent Death Reporting System to allow for the sharing and storing of
all information relevant to the review team's review process, including, but
not limited to, data collection and reporting within the Nebraska Violent Death
Reporting System.
Sec. 5. (1) Upon request by the director, a county attorney or the
Attorney General may issue a subpoena to compel the production of any records
or information specified in this section. Any subpoenaed information shall be
entered into the Nebraska Violent Death Reporting System and provided to the
review team using an aggregate narrative only. Such sources include, but are
not limited to, (a) death investigation reports from a coroner, (b) forensic
autopsy reports, (c) subject to subsection (3) of this section, law enforcement
reports, including probation and corrections reports, (d) medical records and
discharge notes, including hospital, primary care, outpatient, and specialist
records, (e) mental health therapy notes, (f) substance use or treatment
reports, (g) school records, (h) emergency medical services data, (i)
prescription drug monitoring program data, (j) toxicology findings, (k)
interviews with next of kin when available and willing to participate, and (l)
employment records.
(2) A review team shall have access to information and records relating to
a suicide under review by the review team. Within five business days of a
review team's request, it shall be provided with access to the information
requested.
(3) A law enforcement agency, with the approval of the prosecuting
attorney, may withhold from a review team investigative records that may
interfere with a pending criminal investigation or prosecution.
(4) All information and records acquired by a review team are confidential
and are not subject to subpoena, discovery, or introduction into evidence in
any civil or criminal proceeding, except that information, documents, and
records that are otherwise available from other sources are not immune from
subpoena, discovery, or introduction into evidence through those sources solely
because they were presented to, or reviewed by, a review team.
-1-

LB414 LB414
2025 2025
(5) Members of a review team, individuals attending a review team meeting,
and individuals who present information to a review team shall not be
questioned in any civil or criminal proceeding regarding information presented
in a meeting or opinions formed as a result of a meeting. This subsection does
not prevent an individual from testifying to information that is obtained
independently of a review conducted by a review team or that is public
information.
(6) A member of a review team may contact, interview, or request
information from a family member of an individual who died by suicide. The
review team shall approve any contact, interview, or request before the review
team member contacts, interviews, or requests information from such family
member.
Sec. 6. (1)(a) No later than April 1, 2026, and each April 1 thereafter,
the review team shall prepare and submit electronically to the Clerk of the
Legislature, the Department of Health and Human Services, and other nonprofit
organizations, a report that summarizes the following information for each
individual who died by suicide reviewed by the review team in the previous
calendar year: (i) Cause of death; (ii) factors contributing to the death;
(iii) age; (iv) sex; (v) race; (vi) geographic location at the time of death;
and (vii) date of death.
(b) The report shall also include the number of suicide deaths that were
not reviewed in the previous calendar year.
(2) The report may include recommendations for actions that may prevent
additional suicide deaths and any other information, as determined by the
review team.
-2-